Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-4052
Licensure examination; requirements.

(1) A resident individual applying for an insurance producer license shall pass a written examination unless exempt pursuant to section 44-4056 or 44-4069 or subsection (4) of section 44-9304. The examination shall test the knowledge of the individual concerning the lines of authority for which application is made, the duties and responsibilities of an insurance producer, and the insurance laws, rules, and regulations of this state. Examinations required by this section shall be developed and conducted under rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the director.

(2) The director may make arrangements, including contracting with an outside testing service, for administering examinations and collecting the nonrefundable fee set forth in section 44-4064.

(3) Each individual applying for an examination shall remit a nonrefundable fee as prescribed by the director as set forth in section 44-4064.

(4) An individual who fails to appear for the examination as scheduled or fails to pass the examination shall reapply for an examination and remit all required fees and forms before being rescheduled for another examination.

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB458, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB1012, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB863, § 24.